Utah statutes.
16-6a-1601.   Corporate records.

(1)  A nonprofit corporation shall keep as permanent records:

(a)  minutes of all meetings of its members and board of directors;

(b)  a record of all actions taken by the members or board of directors without a meeting;

(c)  a record of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the nonprofit corporation; and

(d) a record of all waivers of notices of meetings of members and of the board of directors or any committee of the board of directors.

(2)  A nonprofit corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

(3)  A nonprofit corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its members in a form that permits preparation of a list of the name and address of all members:

(a)  in alphabetical order, by class; and

(b)  showing the number of votes each member is entitled to vote.

(4)  A nonprofit corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

(5)  A nonprofit corporation shall keep a copy of each of the following records at its principal office:

(a)  its articles of incorporation;

(b)  its bylaws;

(c)  resolutions adopted by its board of directors relating to the characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations, and obligations of members or any class or category of members;

(d)  the minutes of all members' meetings for a period of three years;

(e)  records of all action taken by members without a meeting, for a period of three years;

(f)  all written communications to members generally as members for a period of three years;

(g)  a list of the names and business or home addresses of its current directors and officers;

(h)  a copy of its most recent annual report delivered to the division under Section 16-6a-1607; and

(i)  all financial statements prepared for periods ending during the last three years that a member could have requested under Section 16-6a-1606.

